Vermont, session 2025-2026, H211.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 2430. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Authorized agent” means:
(A) a person designated by a consumer to act on the consumer’s
behalf;
(B) a parent or legal guardian that acts on behalf of the parent’s child
or on behalf of a child for whom the guardian has legal responsibility; or
(C) a guardian or conservator that acts on behalf of a consumer that is
subject to a guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective arrangement.
(2)(A) “Biometric data” means that data generated from the
technological processing of an individual’s unique biological, physical, or
physiological characteristics can be used to identify an individual, including:
(i) iris or retina scans;
(ii) fingerprints;
(iii) facial or hand mapping, geometry, or templates;
(iv) vein patterns;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 2 of 41
2026
(v) voice prints; and
(vi) gait or personally identifying physical movement or patterns.
(B) “Biometric data” does not include:
(i) a digital or physical photograph;
(ii) an audio or video recording; or
(iii) any data generated from a digital or physical photograph, or
an audio or video recording, unless such data is generated to identify a specific
individual.
(3)(A) “Brokered personal information” means one or more of the
following computerized data elements about a consumer, if categorized or
organized for dissemination to third parties:
(i) name;
(ii) address;
(iii) date of birth;
(iv) place of birth;
(v) mother’s maiden name;
(vi) unique biometric data generated from measurements or
technical analysis of human body characteristics used by the owner or licensee
of the data to identify or authenticate the consumer, such as a fingerprint, retina
or iris image, or other unique physical representation or digital representation
of biometric data;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 3 of 41
2026
(vii) name or address of a member of the consumer’s immediate
family or household;
(viii) Social Security number or other government-issued
identification number; or
(ix) other information that, alone or in combination with the other
information sold or licensed, would allow a reasonable person to identify the
consumer with reasonable certainty any information, including derived data
and unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, alone or in
combination with other information, to an identified or identifiable individual
or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is reasonably linkable to one or
more identified or identifiable individuals in a household.
(B) “Brokered personal information” does not include publicly
available information to the extent that it is related to a consumer’s business or
profession.
(2)(4) “Business” means a commercial entity, including a sole
proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, limited liability company,
or other group, however organized and whether or not organized to operate at a
profit, including a financial institution organized, chartered, or holding a
license or authorization certificate under the laws of this State, any other state,
the United States, or any other country, or the parent, affiliate, or subsidiary of
a financial institution, but does not include the State, a State agency, any
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 4 of 41
2026
political subdivision of the State, or a vendor acting solely on behalf of, and at
the direction of, the State.
(3)(5) “Consumer” means an individual residing in this State.
(4)(6)(A) “Data broker” means a business, or unit or units of a business,
separately or together, that knowingly collects and sells or licenses to third
parties the brokered personal information of a consumer with whom the
business does not have a direct relationship.
(B) Examples of a direct relationship with a business include if the
consumer is a past or present:
(i) customer, client, subscriber, user, or registered user of the
business’s goods or services;
(ii) employee, contractor, or agent of the business;
(iii) investor in the business; or
(iv) donor to the business As used in this subdivision (6), “direct
relationship” means that a consumer has intentionally interacted with a
business for the purpose of accessing, purchasing, using, requesting, or
obtaining information about the business’s products or services. A consumer
does not have a direct relationship with a business if the purpose of the
consumer’s engagement is to exercise a consumer right or for the business to
verify the consumer’s identity. A business does not have a direct relationship
with a consumer simply because the business collects brokered personal
information directly from the consumer; the consumer must intend to interact
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 5 of 41
2026
with the business. A business is still a data broker and does not have a direct
relationship with a consumer as to the brokered personal information the
business sells about the consumer that it collected outside of a first-party
interaction with the consumer.
(C) The following activities conducted by a business, and the
collection and sale or licensing of brokered personal information incidental to
conducting these activities, do not qualify the business as a data broker:
(i) developing or maintaining third-party e-commerce or
application platforms;
(ii) providing 411 directory assistance or directory information
services, including name, address, and telephone number, on behalf of or as a
function of a telecommunications carrier;
(iii) providing publicly available information related to a
consumer’s business or profession; or
(iv) providing publicly available information via real-time or near-
real-time alert services for health or safety purposes.
(D)(C) The phrase “sells or licenses” does not include:
(i) a one-time or occasional sale of assets of a business as part of a
transfer of control of those assets that is not part of the ordinary conduct of the
business; or
(ii) a sale or license of data that is merely incidental to the
business.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 6 of 41
2026
(5)(A) “Data broker security breach” means an unauthorized acquisition
or a reasonable belief of an unauthorized acquisition of more than one element
of brokered personal information maintained by a data broker when the
brokered personal information is not encrypted, redacted, or protected by
another method that renders the information unreadable or unusable by an
unauthorized person.
(B) “Data broker security breach” does not include good faith but
unauthorized acquisition of brokered personal information by an employee or
agent of the data broker for a legitimate purpose of the data broker, provided
that the brokered personal information is not used for a purpose unrelated to
the data broker’s business or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(C) In determining whether brokered personal information has been
acquired or is reasonably believed to have been acquired by a person without
valid authorization, a data broker may consider the following factors, among
others:
(i) indications that the brokered personal information is in the
physical possession and control of a person without valid authorization, such
as a lost or stolen computer or other device containing brokered personal
information;
(ii) indications that the brokered personal information has been
downloaded or copied;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 7 of 41
2026
(iii) indications that the brokered personal information was used
by an unauthorized person, such as fraudulent accounts opened or instances of
identity theft reported; or
(iv) that the brokered personal information has been made public.
(6)(7) “Data collector” means a person who, for any purpose, whether
by automated collection or otherwise, handles, collects, disseminates, or
otherwise deals with personally identifiable information, and includes the
State, State agencies, political subdivisions of the State, public and private
universities, privately and publicly held corporations, limited liability
companies, financial institutions, and retail operators.
(7)(8) “Encryption” means use of an algorithmic process to transform
data into a form in which the data is rendered unreadable or unusable without
use of a confidential process or key.
(9)(A) “GenAI system” means an artificial intelligence system that can
generate derived synthetic content, including text, images, video, and audio,
that emulates the structure and characteristics of the system’s training data.
(B) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (9), “artificial
intelligence system” means an engineered or machine-based system that varies
in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or implicit objectives, infer
from the input it receives how to generate outputs that can influence physical
or virtual environments.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 8 of 41
2026
(10) “Identified or identifiable individual” means an individual who can
be readily identified, directly or indirectly.
(8)(11) “License” means a grant of access to, or distribution of, data by
one person to another in exchange for consideration. A use of data for the sole
benefit of the data provider, where the data provider maintains control over the
use of the data, is not a license.
(9)(12) “Login credentials” means a consumer’s user name or e-mail
email address, in combination with a password or an answer to a security
question, that together permit access to an online account.
(10)(13)(A) “Personally identifiable information” means a consumer’s
first name or first initial and last name in combination with one or more of the
following digital data elements, when the data elements are not encrypted,
redacted, or protected by another method that renders them unreadable or
unusable by unauthorized persons, subject to the exception in subdivision (C)
of this subdivision (13):
(i) a Social Security number;
(ii) a driver license or nondriver State identification card number,
individual taxpayer identification number, passport number, military
identification card number, or other identification number that originates from
a government identification document that is commonly used to verify identity
for a commercial transaction;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 9 of 41
2026
(iii) a financial account number or credit or debit card number, if
the number could be used without additional identifying information, access
codes, or passwords;
(iv) a password, personal identification number, or other access
code for a financial account;
(v) unique biometric data generated from measurements or
technical analysis of human body characteristics used by the owner or licensee
of the data to identify or authenticate the consumer, such as a fingerprint, retina
or iris image, or other unique physical representation or digital representation
of biometric data;
(vi) genetic information; and
(vii)(I) health records or records of a wellness program or similar
program of health promotion or disease prevention;
(II) a health care professional’s medical diagnosis or treatment
of the consumer; or
(III) a health insurance policy number.
(B) “Personally identifiable information” does not mean include
publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general
public from federal, State, or local government records.
(C) “Personally identifiable information” does not require a
consumer’s first name or first initial and last name if any of the data elements
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 10 of 41
2026
contained in subdivisions (A)(i)–(vii) of this subdivision (13) is sufficient to
perform or attempt to perform identity theft against the consumer.
(14) “Precise geolocation” means information derived from technology
that can precisely and accurately identify the specific location of a consumer
within a radius of 1,850 feet.
(15) “Processor” means a person who performs any operation or set of
operations, whether by manual or automated means, on brokered personal
information or on sets of brokered personal information, such as the collection,
use, storage, disclosure, analysis, deletion, or modification of brokered
personal information on behalf of a business.
(16)(A) “Publicly available information” means information that:
(i) is made available:
(I) through federal, state, or local government records; or
(II) to the general public from widely distributed media; or
(ii) a data broker has a reasonable basis to believe that the
consumer has lawfully made available to the general public.
(B) “Publicly available information” does not include:
(i) biometric data collected by a business about a consumer
without the consumer’s knowledge;
(ii) any obscene visual depiction, as defined in 18 U.S.C. § 1460;
(iii) genetic data, unless otherwise made publicly available by the
consumer to whom the information pertains; or
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 11 of 41
2026
(iv) intimate images, authentic or computer-generated, known to
be nonconsensual.
(11)(17) “Record” means any material on which written, drawn, spoken,
visual, or electromagnetic information is recorded or preserved, regardless of
physical form or characteristics.
(12)(18) “Redaction” means the rendering of data so that the data are
unreadable or are truncated so that no not more than the last four digits of the
identification number are accessible as part of the data.
(19)(A) “Sale” means the exchange of a consumer’s brokered personal
information by the data broker to a third party for monetary or other valuable
consideration.
(B) “Sale” does not include:
(i) the disclosure of brokered personal information to a processor
that processes the brokered personal information on behalf of the data broker;
(ii) the disclosure of brokered personal information to a third party
for purposes of providing a product or service requested by the consumer;
(iii) the disclosure or transfer of brokered personal information to
an affiliate of the data broker;
(iv) the disclosure, with the consumer’s consent, of brokered
personal information where the consumer directs the data broker to disclose the
brokered personal information or intentionally uses the data broker to interact
with a third party;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 12 of 41
2026
(v) the disclosure of publicly available information; or
(vi) the disclosure or transfer of brokered personal information to
a third party as an asset that is part of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or
other transaction, or a proposed merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or other
transaction, in which the third party assumes control of all or part of the data
broker’s assets.
(C) As used in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (19), “affiliate”
means a legal entity that shares common branding with another legal entity or
controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with another legal entity.
(D) As used in subdivision (C) of this subdivision (19), “control” or
“controlled” means:
(i) ownership of, or the power to vote, more than 50 percent of the
outstanding shares of any class of voting security of a company;
(ii) control in any manner over the election of a majority of the
directors or of individuals exercising similar functions; or
(iii) the power to exercise controlling influence over the
management of a company.
(13)(20)(A) “Security breach” means unauthorized acquisition of
electronic data, or a reasonable belief of an unauthorized acquisition of
electronic data, that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of a
consumer’s personally identifiable information or login credentials maintained
by a data collector.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 13 of 41
2026
(B) “Security breach” does not include good faith but unauthorized
acquisition of personally identifiable information or login credentials by an
employee or agent of the data collector for a legitimate purpose of the data
collector, provided that the personally identifiable information or login
credentials are not used for a purpose unrelated to the data collector’s business
or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(C) In determining whether personally identifiable information or
login credentials have been acquired or is are reasonably believed to have been
acquired by a person without valid authorization, a data collector may consider
the following factors, among others:
(i) indications that the information is in the physical possession
and control of a person without valid authorization, such as a lost or stolen
computer or other device containing information;
(ii) indications that the information has been downloaded or
copied;
(iii) indications that the information was used by an unauthorized
person, such as fraudulent accounts opened or instances of identity theft
reported; or
(iv) that the information has been made public.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 14 of 41
2026
§ 2431. ACQUISITION AND DISCLOSURE OF BROKERED PERSONAL
INFORMATION; PROHIBITIONS
(a) Prohibited acquisition and use.
(1) A person shall not acquire brokered personal information through
fraudulent means.
(2) A person shall not acquire or use brokered personal information for
the purpose of:
(A) stalking or harassing another person;
(B) committing a fraud, including identity theft, financial fraud, or e-
mail email fraud; or
(C) engaging in unlawful discrimination, including employment
discrimination and housing discrimination.
(b) Disclosure. A data broker shall:
(1) maintain procedures that require prospective users of the data
broker’s brokered personal information to identify themselves, state the
purposes for which the information is sought, and certify that the information
shall be used for no other purpose;
(2) prior to disclosing brokered personal information to a prospective
user and pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) make a reasonable effort to verify the identity of the prospective
user of the information; and
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 15 of 41
2026
(B) review the user’s stated purposes for which the information is
sought; and
(3) not disclose brokered personal information to a prospective user if
the data broker has reasonable grounds for believing that the information will
be used to violate State or federal law or will not be used for the purposes
stated by the user pursuant to this subsection.
(c) Enforcement.
(1) A person who violates a provision of this section commits an unfair
and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(2) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, bring civil actions, and take other
enforcement actions as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
Subchapter 2. Security Breach Notice Act Breaches
§ 2435. NOTICE OF SECURITY BREACHES
* * *
(b) Notice of breach.
* * *
(6) A data collector may provide notice of a security breach involving
personally identifiable information to a consumer by one or more of the
following methods:
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 16 of 41
2026
(A) Direct notice, which may be by one of the following methods:
(i) written notice mailed to the consumer’s residence;
(ii) electronic notice, for those consumers for whom the data
collector has a valid e-mail email address, if:
(I) the data collector’s primary method of communication with
the consumer is by electronic means, the electronic notice does not request or
contain a hypertext link to a request that the consumer provide personal
information, and the electronic notice conspicuously warns consumers not to
provide personal information in response to electronic communications
regarding security breaches; or
(II) the notice is consistent with the provisions regarding
electronic records and signatures for notices in 15 U.S.C. § 7001; or
(iii) telephonic notice, for those consumers for whom the data
collector has a valid phone number, provided that the telephonic contact is
made directly with each affected consumer and not through a prerecorded
message and further provided that the data collector makes not less than five
attempts to contact the consumer for a live conversation before the data
collector may leave a voicemail providing information about the breach.
* * *
(c) Notice to consumer reporting agencies. In the event a data collector
provides notice to more than 1,000 consumers at one time pursuant to this
section, the data collector shall notify, without unreasonable delay, all
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 17 of 41
2026
consumer reporting agencies that compile and maintain files on consumers on
a nationwide basis, as defined in 15 U.S.C. § 1681a(p), of the timing,
distribution, and content of the notice. This subsection shall not apply to a
person who is licensed or registered under Title 8 by the Department of
Financial Regulation.
(d) Exception to notice requirement.
(1) Notice of a security breach pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
is not required if the data collector establishes that misuse of personally
identifiable information or login credentials is not reasonably possible and the
data collector provides notice of the determination that the misuse of the
personally identifiable information or login credentials is not reasonably
possible pursuant to the requirements of this subsection. If the data collector
establishes that misuse of the personally identifiable information or login
credentials is not reasonably possible, the data collector shall provide notice of
its determination that misuse of the personally identifiable information or login
credentials is not reasonably possible and a detailed explanation for said
determination to the Vermont Attorney General or to the Department of
Financial Regulation in the event that the data collector is a person or entity
licensed or registered with the Department under Title 8 or this title. The data
collector may designate its notice and detailed explanation to the Vermont
Attorney General or the Department of Financial Regulation as “trade secret”
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 18 of 41
2026
if the notice and detailed explanation meet the definition of trade secret
contained in 1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(9).
* * *
(e) HIPAA compliance. A data collector that is subject to the privacy,
security, and breach notification rules adopted in 45 C.F.R. Part 164 pursuant
to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, P.L. 104-
191 (1996) is deemed to be in compliance with this subchapter if the data
collector:
(1) the data collector experiences a security breach that is limited to
personally identifiable information specified in subdivision 2430(10)(A)(vii) of
this chapter; and
(2) the data collector provides notice to affected consumers pursuant to
the requirements of the breach notification rule in 45 C.F.R. Part 164, Subpart
D; and
(3) provides notice to the Attorney General or to the Department of
Financial Regulation pursuant to subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this section along
with a written certification of compliance with 45 C.F.R. Part 164, Subpart D.
(f) Waiver. Any waiver of the provisions of this subchapter is contrary to
public policy and is void and unenforceable.
(g) Financial institutions. Except as provided in subdivision (3) of this
subsection, a financial institution that is subject to the following guidances, and
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 19 of 41
2026
any revisions, additions, or substitutions relating to an interagency guidance,
shall be exempt from this section:
* * *
(h) Enforcement.
* * *
(2) With respect to a data collector that is a person or entity licensed or
registered with regulated by the Department of Financial Regulation under
Title 8 or this title, the Department of Financial Regulation shall have the full
authority to investigate potential violations of this subchapter and to prosecute,
obtain, and impose remedies for a violation of this subchapter or any rules or
regulations adopted pursuant to this subchapter, as the Department has under
Title 8 or this title or any other applicable law or regulation.
* * *
§ 2436. NOTICE OF DATA BROKER SECURITY BREACHES
(a) Short title and definitions.
(1) This section shall be known as the “Data Broker Security Breach
Notice Act.”
(2)(A) As used in this section, “data broker security breach” means an
unauthorized acquisition or a reasonable belief of an unauthorized acquisition
of more than one instance of brokered personal information maintained by a
data broker when the brokered personal information is not encrypted, redacted,
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 20 of 41
2026
or protected by another method that renders the information unreadable or
unusable by an unauthorized person.
(B) “Data broker security breach” does not include good faith but
unauthorized acquisition of brokered personal information by an employee or
agent of the data broker for a legitimate purpose of the data broker, provided
that the brokered personal information is not used for a purpose unrelated to
the data broker’s business or subject to further unauthorized disclosure.
(C) In determining whether brokered personal information has been
acquired or is reasonably believed to have been acquired by a person without
valid authorization, a data broker may consider the following factors, among
others:
(i) indications that the brokered personal information is in the
physical possession and control of a person without valid authorization, such
as a lost or stolen computer or other device containing brokered personal
information;
(ii) indications that the brokered personal information has been
downloaded or copied;
(iii) indications that the brokered personal information was used
by an unauthorized person, such as fraudulent accounts opened or instances of
identity theft reported; or
(iv) that the brokered personal information has been made public.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 21 of 41
2026
(b) Notice of breach.
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a data
broker shall, following discovery or notification to the data broker of a security
breach affecting a consumer, notify the consumer that there has been a data
broker security breach. Notice of the security breach shall be made in the most
expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, but not later than 45
days after the discovery or notification, consistent with the legitimate needs of
the law enforcement agency, as provided in subdivisions (3) and (4) of this
subsection, or with any measures necessary to determine the scope of the
security breach and restore the reasonable integrity, security, and
confidentiality of the data system.
(2) A data broker shall provide notice of a breach to the Attorney
General as follows:
(A)(i) The data broker shall notify the Attorney General of the date of
the security breach and the date of discovery of the breach and shall provide a
preliminary description of the breach within 14 business days, consistent with
the legitimate needs of the law enforcement agency, as provided in
subdivisions (3) and (4) of this subsection (b), after the data broker’s discovery
of the security breach.
(ii) If the date of the breach is unknown at the time notice is sent
to the Attorney General, the data broker shall send the Attorney General the
date of the breach as soon as it is known.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 22 of 41
2026
(iii) Unless otherwise ordered by a court of this State for good
cause shown, a notice provided under this subdivision (2)(A) shall not be
disclosed, without the consent of the data broker, to any person other than the
authorized agent or representative of the Attorney General, a State’s Attorney,
or another law enforcement officer engaged in legitimate law enforcement
activities.
(B)(i) When the data broker provides notice of the breach pursuant to
subdivision (1) of this subsection (b), the data broker shall notify the Attorney
General of the number of Vermont consumers affected, if known to the data
broker, and shall provide a copy of the notice provided to consumers under
subdivision (1) of this subsection (b).
(ii) The data broker may send to the Attorney General a second
copy of the consumer notice, from which is redacted the type of brokered
personal information that was subject to the breach, that the Attorney General
shall use for any public disclosure of the breach.
(3) The notice to the Attorney General and a consumer required by this
subsection shall be delayed upon request of a law enforcement agency. A law
enforcement agency may request the delay if it believes that notification may
impede a law enforcement investigation or a national or Homeland Security
investigation or jeopardize public safety or national or Homeland Security
interests. In the event law enforcement makes the request for a delay in a
manner other than in writing, the data broker shall document the request
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 23 of 41
2026
contemporaneously in writing and include the name of the law enforcement
officer making the request and the officer’s law enforcement agency engaged
in the investigation. A law enforcement agency shall promptly notify the data
broker in writing when the law enforcement agency no longer believes that
notification may impede a law enforcement investigation or a national or
Homeland Security investigation or jeopardize public safety or national or
Homeland Security interests. The data broker shall provide notice required by
this subsection without unreasonable delay upon receipt of a written
communication, which includes facsimile or electronic communication, from
the law enforcement agency withdrawing its request for delay.
(4) The notice to a consumer required in subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall be clear and conspicuous. A notice to a consumer of a
security breach involving brokered personal information shall include a
description of each of the following, if known to the data broker:
(A) the incident in general terms;
(B) the categories of brokered personal information that was subject
to the security breach;
(C) the general acts of the data broker to protect the brokered
personal information from further security breach;
(D) a telephone number, toll-free if available, that the consumer may
call for further information and assistance;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 24 of 41
2026
(E) advice that directs the consumer to remain vigilant by reviewing
account statements and monitoring free credit reports; and
(F) the approximate date of the data broker security breach.
(5) A data broker may provide notice of a security breach involving
brokered personal information to a consumer by two or more of the following
methods:
(A) written notice mailed to the consumer’s residence;
(B) electronic notice, for those consumers for whom the data broker
has a valid email address, if:
(i) the data broker’s primary method of communication with the
consumer is by electronic means, the electronic notice does not request or
contain a hypertext link to a request that the consumer provide personal
information, and the electronic notice conspicuously warns consumers not to
provide personal information in response to electronic communications
regarding security breaches; or
(ii) the notice is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic
records and signatures for notices in 15 U.S.C. § 7001;
(C) telephonic notice, for those consumers for whom the data broker
has a valid phone number, provided that the telephonic contact is made directly
with each affected consumer and not through a prerecorded message and
further provided that the data broker makes not less than five attempts to
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 25 of 41
2026
contact the consumer for a live conversation before the data broker may leave a
voicemail providing information about the breach; or
(D) notice by publication in a newspaper of statewide circulation in
the event the data broker cannot effectuate notice by any other means.
(c) Exception to notice requirement.
(1) Notice of a security breach pursuant to subsection (b) of this section
is not required if the data broker establishes that misuse of brokered personal
information is not reasonably possible and the data broker provides notice of
the determination that the misuse of the brokered personal information is not
reasonably possible pursuant to the requirements of this subsection. If the data
broker establishes that misuse of the brokered personal information is not
reasonably possible, the data broker shall provide notice of its determination
that misuse of the brokered personal information is not reasonably possible and
a detailed explanation for said determination to the Attorney General. The data
broker may designate its notice and detailed explanation to the Attorney
General as a trade secret if the notice and detailed explanation meet the
definition of trade secret contained in 1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(9). Upon review of
the data broker’s notice and detailed explanation, the Attorney General may
request additional information from the data broker and may accept or reject
the data broker’s determination. If the Attorney General rejects the data
broker’s determination, the data broker shall provide notice of the security
breach pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 26 of 41
2026
(2) If a data broker established that misuse of brokered personal
information was not reasonably possible under subdivision (1) of this
subsection and subsequently obtains facts indicating that misuse of the
brokered personal information has occurred or is occurring, the data broker
shall provide notice of the security breach pursuant to subsection (b) of this
section.
(d) Waiver. Any waiver of the provisions of this subchapter is contrary to
public policy and is void and unenforceable.
(e) Enforcement.
(1) A person who violates a provision of this section commits an unfair
and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(2) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions as provided
under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
* * *
Subchapter 3A. Student Privacy
* * *
§ 2443f. ENFORCEMENT
(a) A person who violates a provision of this chapter subchapter commits
an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this
title.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 27 of 41
2026
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subchapter and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions as provided
under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
* * *
Subchapter 5. Data Brokers
§ 2446. DATA BROKERS; ANNUAL REGISTRATION
(a) Annually, on or before January 31 following a year in which a
Registration. A person meets, not more than 30 days after meeting the
definition of a data broker as provided in section 2430 of this title, a data
broker and then once annually thereafter on or before July 1 of each year, shall:
(1) register with the Secretary of State as a data broker;
(2) pay a registration fee of $100.00 $900.00;
(3) maintain a bond in the amount of $20,000.00 that shall run to the
State for any liability arising under this subchapter, provided that the action on
the bond is brought within two years after accrual of the cause of action; and
(4) provide the following information about the data broker to the
Secretary of State:
(A) the name and primary physical, e-mail, and Internet addresses
email, and internet addresses and phone number of the data broker;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 28 of 41
2026
(B) if the data broker permits a consumer to opt out of the data
broker’s collection of brokered personal information, opt out of its databases,
or opt out of certain sales of data:
(i) the method for requesting an opt-out;
(ii) if the opt-out applies to only certain activities or sales, which
ones; and
(iii) whether the data broker permits a consumer to authorize a
third party to perform the opt-out on the consumer’s behalf;
(C) a statement specifying the data collection, databases, or sales
activities from which a consumer may not opt out;
(D) a statement whether the data broker implements a purchaser
credentialing process;
(E)(C) pursuant to section 2436 of this chapter, the number of data
broker security breaches that the data broker has experienced during the prior
year, and if known, the total number of consumers affected by the breaches;
(F)(D) where the data broker has actual knowledge that it possesses
the brokered personal information of minors, a separate statement detailing the
data collection practices, databases, sales activities, and opt-out policies that
are applicable to the brokered personal information of minors; and
(G)(E) whether the data broker:
(i) collects the:
(I) precise geolocation of consumers;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 29 of 41
2026
(II) reproductive health care data of consumers;
(III) biometric data of consumers;
(IV) immigration status of consumers;
(V) sexual orientation of consumers;
(VI) union membership status of consumers;
(VII) name, date of birth, zip code, email address, or phone
number of consumers;
(VIII) account login or account number of consumers in
combination with any required security code, access code, or password that
would permit access to a consumer’s account with a third party;
(IX) driver’s license number, State identification card number,
Social Security number, passport number, military identification number, or
other unique identification number of consumers issued on a government
document commonly used to verify the identity of a specific individual; or
(X) mobile advertising identification number, connected
television identification number, or vehicle identification number of
consumers; and
(ii) in the past year, has shared consumers’ data with or sold
consumers’ data to:
(I) a foreign actor;
(II) the federal government;
(III) other state or local governments;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 30 of 41
2026
(IV) law enforcement, unless the data was shared pursuant to a
subpoena or other court order; or
(V) a developer of a GenAI system or model;
(F) the three most common types of personal information that the
data broker collects, if the data broker does not collect the information set forth
in subdivisions (E)(i)(VII) and (E)(i)(IX) of this subdivision (4);
(G) an electronic copy of the data broker’s:
(i) bond, pursuant to subdivision (3) of this subsection (a); and
(ii) current privacy policy;
(H) any additional information or explanation the data broker
chooses to provide concerning its data collection practices;
(I) the URL of a page on the data broker’s website that:
(i) if the data broker permits deletion, allows a consumer to
request that a data broker delete the brokered personal information of the
consumer; and
(ii) informs consumers about the rights of consumers to opt out of
the collection of the consumer’s brokered personal information, including:
(I) whether the data broker permits a consumer to opt out of its
databases, or opt out of certain sales of data;
(II) the procedure for requesting an opt-out;
(III) if the opt-out applies to only certain activities or sales,
which activities or sales it applies to;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 31 of 41
2026
(IV) whether the data broker permits a consumer to authorize
an authorized agent to perform the opt out on the consumer’s behalf; and
(V) the data collection, databases, or sales activities from
which a consumer may not opt out; and
(J) whether and to what extent the data broker or any of its
subsidiaries is regulated by the Fair Credit Reporting Act; and
(5) amend an existing registration the data broker has with the Secretary
of State if required by this section or by the State upon the payment of an
administrative fee of $100.00.
(b) A data broker that fails to register pursuant to subsection (a) of this
section is liable to the State for: Penalties.
(1) a civil penalty of $50.00 for each day, not to exceed a total of
$10,000.00 for each year, it fails to register pursuant to this section;
(2) an amount equal to the fees due under this section during the period
it failed to register pursuant to this section; and
(3) other penalties imposed by law.
(1) A data broker that fails to register as required by subsection (a) of
this section is liable to the State for:
(A) an administrative fine of $200.00 for each day the data broker
fails to register;
(B) an amount equal to the fees that were due during the period the
data broker failed to register; and
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 32 of 41
2026
(C) any reasonable costs incurred by the State in the investigation
and administration of the action as the court deems appropriate.
(2) A data broker that fails to provide all registration information
required in subdivision (a)(4) of this section shall file an amendment pursuant
to subdivision (a)(5) of this section that includes any omitted information not
later than 30 days after discovering or receiving notification of the omission
and is liable to the State for a civil penalty of $1,000.00 per day for each day
thereafter that the data broker does not file an amendment providing the
omitted information.
(3) A data broker that files materially incorrect information in its
registration shall:
(A) be liable to the State for a civil penalty of $25,000.00; and
(B) correct the materially incorrect information by filing an
amendment pursuant to subdivision (a)(5) of this section not later than 30 days
after discovering or receiving notification of the incorrect information, and, if
it fails to correct the information, the data broker shall be liable for an
additional civil penalty of $1,000.00 per day for each day the data broker fails
to correct the information.
(c) The Attorney General may maintain an action in the Civil Division
of the Superior Court to collect the penalties imposed in this section and to
seek appropriate injunctive relief. Consumer rights web page. The Secretary
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 33 of 41
2026
of State shall create and maintain a publicly accessible page on its website that
provides consumers with the following:
(1) a downloadable spreadsheet of data brokers that have registered with
the State along with the information a data broker provides during registration
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section; and
(2) any additional information about the rights consumers have pursuant
to this subchapter.
(d) Enforcement.
(1) A person who violates a provision of this section commits an unfair
and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(2) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this section and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions as provided
under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
(e) Definitions. As used in this subchapter, “consumer” means an
individual residing in this State and does not include an individual acting in a
commercial or employment context or as an employee, owner, director, officer,
or contractor of a company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit
organization, or government agency whose communications or transactions
with the data broker occur solely within the context of that individual’s role
with the company, partnership, sole proprietorship, nonprofit organization, or
government agency.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 34 of 41
2026
§ 2447. DATA BROKER DUTY TO PROTECT INFORMATION;
STANDARDS; TECHNICAL REQUIREMENTS
* * *
(d) Enforcement.
(1) A person who violates a provision of this section commits an unfair
and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(2) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this chapter section and to conduct civil
investigations, enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions
as provided under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
Sec. 2. STUDY OF ACCESSIBLE DELETION MECHANISM; REPORT
(a) The Secretary of State shall study the feasibility of:
(1) establishing an accessible deletion mechanism that:
(A) implements and maintains reasonable security procedures and
practices, including administrative, physical, and technical safeguards
appropriate to the nature of the information and the purposes for which
brokered personal information will be used and to protect a consumer’s
brokered personal information from unauthorized use, disclosure, access,
destruction, or modification;
(B) allows a consumer, through a single verifiable consumer request,
to request that every data broker that maintains any brokered personal
information about the consumer delete the brokered personal information;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 35 of 41
2026
(C) allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific data brokers
from a request made under subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1);
(D) allows a consumer to alter a previous request made pursuant to
subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1) after at least 45 days have passed since
the consumer last made a request;
(E) allows a consumer to request the deletion of all brokered personal
information related to that consumer all at once through a single deletion
request;
(F) permits a consumer to securely submit information in one or
more privacy-protecting ways to aid in the deletion request;
(G) allows a data broker registered with the Secretary of State to
determine whether a consumer has submitted a verifiable request to delete the
brokered personal information related to that consumer as described in
subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1);
(H) does not allow the disclosure of any additional brokered personal
information of a consumer when the data broker accesses the accessible
deletion mechanism, unless otherwise specified in this subchapter;
(I) allows a consumer to make a request described in subdivision (B)
of this subdivision (1) using a website operated by the Secretary of State;
(J) does not charge a consumer to make a request described in
subdivision (B) of this subdivision (1);
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 36 of 41
2026
(K) is readily accessible and usable by consumers with disabilities;
(L) supports the ability of a consumer’s authorized agents to aid in
the deletion request;
(M) allows the consumer or their authorized agent to verify the status
of the consumer’s deletion request; and
(N) provides a description of the following:
(i) the deletion permitted by this section;
(ii) the process for submitting a deletion request pursuant to this
section; and
(iii) examples of the types of information that may be deleted; and
(2) utilizing a data broker’s registry fund to hold monies received for
transactions pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 2446 and to disburse for the purpose of
supporting and offsetting the costs of the accessible deletion mechanism set
forth in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(b) Reporting. The Secretary of State shall, based on the study set forth in
subsection (a) of this section, submit to the House Committee on Commerce
and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on Economic
Development, Housing and General Affairs an interim report on or before
December 1, 2027, and a final report on or before December 1, 2028, including
its findings and any proposed legislation for the General Assembly’s
consideration. The interim report shall provide the General Assembly with any
recommended actions to pursue in the 2028 legislative session.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 37 of 41
2026
* * * Cybersecurity Advisory Council * * *
Sec. 3. 20 V.S.A. § 4662 is amended to read:
§ 4662. CYBERSECURITY ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation. There is created the Cybersecurity Advisory Council to
advise on the State’s cybersecurity infrastructure, best practices,
communications protocols, standards, training, and safeguards.
(b) Membership. The Council shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Chief Information Officer, who shall serve as the Chair or
appoint a designee from the Council to serve as the Chair;
(2) the Chief Information Security Officer;
(3) a representative from a distribution or transmission utility, appointed
by the Commissioner of Public Service;
(4) a representative from a State municipal water system, appointed by
the Secretary of Natural Resources;
(5) a representative from a Vermont hospital, appointed by the President
of the Vermont Association of Hospitals and Health Systems;
(6) a person representing a Vermont business related to an essential
supply chain, appointed by the Chair of the Vermont Business Roundtable;
(7) the Director of Vermont Emergency Management or designee;
(8) the Governor’s Homeland Security Advisor or designee;
(9) the Vermont Adjutant General or designee;
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 38 of 41
2026
(10) the Attorney General or designee; and
(11) the President of Vermont Information Technology Leaders or
designee;
(12) the Chair of the House Committee on Energy and Digital
Infrastructure;
(13) the Chair of the Senate Committee on Institutions; and
(14) a representative from the Judiciary, appointed by the Chief Justice
of the Supreme Court.
* * *
Sec. 3a. 2023 Acts and Resolves No. 71, Sec. 4 is amended to read:
Sec. 4. REPEAL
20 V.S.A. chapter 208 (cybersecurity) is repealed on June 30, 2028 2033.
* * * Educational Technology * * *
Sec. 4. 9 V.S.A. chapter 62 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 62. PROTECTION OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
* * *
Subchapter 3A. Student Privacy
* * *
§ 2443f. ENFORCEMENT
(a) A person who violates a provision of this chapter subchapter commits
an unfair and deceptive act in commerce in violation of section 2453 of this
title.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 39 of 41
2026
(b) The Attorney General has the same authority to adopt rules to
implement the provisions of this subchapter and to conduct civil investigations,
enter into assurances of discontinuance, and bring civil actions as provided
under chapter 63, subchapter 1 of this title.
Subchapter 3B. Educational Technology
§ 2444a. REGISTRATION
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1)(A) “Educational technology product” and “product” mean any
software, application, or platform that may collect, process, or transmit student
data and that is used for teaching and learning purposes in a school in
Vermont.
(B) “Educational technology product” and “product” does not
include:
(i) hardware or other physical devices; or
(ii) a product that is being used in a school without the knowledge
of the provider.
(2) “Filing” means an initial registration, amendment, periodic report, or
other filing with the Secretary of State as the Secretary may require.
(3) “Provider of an educational technology product” and “provider”
mean a person that provides an educational technology product that is in use at
a school.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 40 of 41
2026
(4) “School” means a public school or an independent school approved
pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 166 and includes school districts.
(5) “School district” has the same meaning as in 16 V.S.A. § 11(a).
(b) Mandatory data reporting. In addition to all other requirements of a
person registering with the Secretary of State pursuant to State law, a person
doing business in this State as a provider of an educational technology product
shall, at the time of a filing, provide the following:
(1) the name and primary physical, email, and internet addresses of the
person;
(2) a link to the most recent version of the privacy policy and terms and
conditions of each product in use in any school;
(3) the name of each school in which the provider is operating pursuant
to a paid contract;
(4) the name and a brief description of each product of the provider, or a
URL that provides the same information;
(5) which products may be in use in any school; and
(6) an attestation that each product meets:
(A) the standards set forth in subchapter 3A of this chapter (student
privacy) and subchapter 6 of this chapter (the Vermont Age-Appropriate
Design Code Act); and
(B) all relevant federal and State privacy laws, including the federal
Children’s Online Privacy Protection Act.
VT LEG #390220 v.1

No. 138 Page 41 of 41
2026
* * * Effective Dates * * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. 1 and 4 shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
(b) This section and Secs. 2 and 3 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 16, 2026
VT LEG #390220 v.1